Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 4. Administration of Finances

§ 16-12-401.
Applicability.

This article specifies requirements pertaining to budgeting of the entities listed in W.S. 16-12-202(a) where the principal act is silent or unclear. The specific provisions of a principal act are effective or controlling to the extent they conflict with this article.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-402.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Appropriation” means an allocation of money to be expended for a specific purpose;

“Budget” means a plan of financial operations for a fiscal year embodying estimates of all proposed expenditures, the proposed means of financing them and what the work or service is to accomplish;

“Budget year” means the fiscal year or years for which a budget is prepared;

“Department” means the state department of audit;

“Estimated revenue” means the amount of revenues estimated to be received during the budget year in each fund;

“Fiscal year” means the annual period for recording fiscal operations beginning July 1 and ending June 30;

“Fund balance” means the excess of the assets over liabilities, reserves and contributions, as reflected by an entity’s books of account;

“Proposed budget” means the budget presented for public hearing as required by W.S.

16-12-406

and formatted as required by W.S. 9-1-507(a)(viii) and

16-12-403

;

“Unappropriated surplus” means the portion of the fund balance of a budgetary fund which has not been appropriated or reserved in an ensuing budget year.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-403.
Preparation of budgets; contents; review.

Each special district or other specified entity shall prepare a proposed budget pursuant to W.S. 9-1-507(a)(viii). The proposed budget shall comply with department rules and set forth:

Actual revenues and expenditures in the last completed budget year;

Estimated total revenues and expenditures for the current budget year;

The estimated available revenues and expenditures for the ensuing budget year.

The estimates of revenues shall contain estimates of all anticipated revenues from any source whatsoever. The estimates shall be made according to budget year, including the difference from the previous budget year for each source.

Each proposed and adopted budget shall be accompanied by a budget message in explanation of the budget. The budget message shall contain an outline of the proposed financial policies for the budget year and describe in connection therewith the important features of the budgetary plan. It shall state the amount of reserves on hand and outline the reserve policy for the budget year. It shall also state the reasons for changes from the previous year in appropriation and revenue items and explain any major changes in financial policy.

The proposed budget shall be reviewed and considered by the governing body of the special district or other specified entity in a regular or special meeting called for this purpose. Following a public hearing as provided in W.S.

16-12-406

, the special district or other specified entity shall adopt a budget.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-404.
Accumulated reserves or fund surplus.

A special district or other specified entity may accumulate reserves in any fund. With respect to the general fund the accumulated fund balance may be used to meet any legal obligation of the special district or other specified entity or to:

Provide cash to finance expenditures from the beginning of the budget year until property taxes and other revenues are collected; or

Provide a reserve to meet emergency expenditures.

Money in the reserves may be allowed to accumulate from year to year until the accumulated total is sufficient for specified purposes in accordance with reserve policy.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-405.
Property tax levy.

The amount of estimated revenue from property tax required by the budget shall constitute the basis for determination of the property tax to be levied for the corresponding tax years subject to legal limitations.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-406.
Budget hearings.

At the request of the board of county commissioners and prior to adopting a budget, special districts or other specified entities shall hold a prehearing with the county commissioners. The special district or other specified entity shall hold a budget hearing in accordance with this section. Notice of the budget hearing shall be provided pursuant to the requirements of W.S. 16-12-304(b).

At the request of the board of county commissioners and prior to July 1, the governing board of the special district or other specified entity shall present to the county commissioners:

A proposed budget;

Verification of elections, public meetings and board member training; and

The minutes from any meetings the district or other specified entity has held that year.

Hearings for special district or other specified entity budgets shall be conducted not later than the third Thursday in July except as hereafter provided. The governing board of any special district or other specified entity may choose to hold the budget hearing in conjunction with the county budget hearings and so advertise. Copies of publications of hearings shall be furnished to the director of the state department of audit.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-407.
Limitation on appropriations.

A special district or other specified entity shall not make any appropriation in the final budget of any fund in excess of the estimated expendable revenue and reserves of the fund for the budget year.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-408.
Adoption of budget.

Within three (3) business days of the conclusion of the public hearing under W.S.

16-12-406

, the governing body of each special district or other specified entity shall adopt the budget. Certified copies of the adopted budget shall be on file in the office of the special district or other specified entity and made available for public inspection pursuant to W.S.

16-12-303

. The adopted budget shall be filed with the department of audit and county clerk on behalf of the county commissioners no later than July 31. The adopted budget shall be forwarded by the county clerk to the county assessor and county commissioners before mill levies are set.

Prior to adopting the budget, the county commissioners may veto, in whole or in part, line items of budgets presented by special districts or other specified entities whose entire governing board was appointed by the county commissioners.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-409.
Transfer of unencumbered or unexpended appropriation balances.

The governing body of a special district or other specified entity may by resolution transfer any unencumbered or unexpended appropriation balance or part thereof from one (1) fund or account to another. Notice under this section shall be provided pursuant to the requirements of W.S.

16-4-404

.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-410.
General fund budget increase.

The budget of the general fund may be increased by resolution of the governing body of the special district or other specified entity. The source of the revenue shall be shown whether unanticipated, unappropriated surplus, donations, etc. Where required by the principal act, the special district or other specified entity shall receive approval by the county commissioners prior to the budget increase.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-411.
Emergency expenditures.

If the governing body of a special district or other specified entity determines an emergency exists and the expenditure of money in excess of the general fund budget is necessary, it may make the expenditures from available funds as reasonably necessary to meet the emergency. Notice of the declaration of emergency and the amount of the emergency expenditures shall be provided in accordance with W.S.

16-4-404

.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-412.
Appropriations lapse; prior claims and obligations.

All appropriations shall lapse following the close of the budget year to the extent they are not expended or encumbered. All claims and obligations incurred prior to the close of any fiscal year shall be treated as if properly encumbered.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-413.
Transfer of special fund balances.

If the necessity to maintain any special revenue or assessment fund ceases and there is a balance in the fund, the governing body of the special district or other specified entity shall authorize the transfer of the balance to the fund balance account in the general fund.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 16-12-414.
Interfund loans.

The governing body of the special district or other specified entity may authorize by resolution interfund loans from one (1) fund to another at interest rates and terms for repayment as it may prescribe and may invest available cash in any fund as provided by law. Where required by the principal act, the special district or other specified entity shall receive approval by the county commissioners prior to the interfund loan.

History.

2017 ch. 62, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 62, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.